Utah statutes.
17-15-19.   Costs of change of venue -- Adjustment between counties.
In all civil cases where any change of venue is granted from one county to
another, excepting where the change is granted because the action should have
been begun in the county to which the case is taken for trial, the costs and
expenses connected with the trial of the action that are payable by the county
shall be refunded by the county in which the action originated to the county
in which the case is tried, upon the county clerk of the county wherein the
case is tried certifying the amount of costs so paid to the county clerk of
the county wherein the action originated.
